California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) For purposes of this section, “child,” “minor parent,” and “nonminor
 dependent parent” have the same meaning as in Section 16002.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 585, Sec. 3.   (AB 670)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

(a) If a child is adjudged a dependent child of the court on the ground that the child is a person described by Section 300, the court may make any and all reasonable orders for the care, supervision, custody, conduct, maintenance, and support of the child, including medical treatment, subject to further order of the court.

(b) (1) To facilitate coordination and cooperation among agencies, the court may, at any time after a petition has been filed, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard, join in the juvenile court proceedings any agency that the court determines has failed to meet a legal obligation to provide services to a child for whom a petition has
 been filed under Section 300, to a nonminor, as described in Section 303, or to a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, regardless of the status of the adjudication. In any proceeding in which an agency is joined, the court shall not impose duties upon the agency beyond those mandated by law. Nothing in this section shall prohibit agencies that have received notice of the hearing on joinder from meeting prior to the hearing to coordinate services.

(2) The court has no authority to order services unless it has been determined through the administrative process of an agency that has been joined as a party, that the child, nonminor, or nonminor dependent is eligible for those services. With respect to mental health assessment, treatment, and case management services pursuant to Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section
 7570) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the court’s determination shall be limited to whether the agency has complied with that chapter.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “agency” means any governmental agency or any private service provider or individual that receives federal, state, or local governmental funding or reimbursement for providing services directly to a child, nonminor, or nonminor dependent.

(c) If a child is adjudged a dependent child of the court, on the ground that the child is a person described by Section 300, and the court orders that a parent or guardian shall retain custody of the child subject to the supervision of the social worker, the parents or guardians shall be required to participate in child welfare services or services
 provided by an appropriate agency designated by the court.

(d) The juvenile court may direct any reasonable orders to the parents or guardians of the child who is the subject of any proceedings under this chapter as the court deems necessary and proper to carry out this section, including orders to appear before a county financial evaluation officer. That order may include a direction to participate in a counseling or education program, including, but not limited to, a parent education and parenting program operated by a community college, school district, or other appropriate agency designated by the court. A foster parent or relative with whom the child is placed may be directed to participate in such a program in cases in which the court deems participation is appropriate and in the child’s best interest. The program in which a
 parent or guardian is required to participate shall be designed to eliminate those conditions that led to the court’s finding that the child is a person described by Section 300.

(e) If a child is adjudged a dependent child of the court, the juvenile court may direct any reasonable orders to the parents or
 guardians of the child who is the subject of any proceedings under this chapter to ensure the child’s regular school attendance and to make reasonable efforts to obtain educational services necessary to meet the specific needs of the child.

(f) When making reasonable orders under this section, the court shall inquire whether a parent or guardian can afford the court-ordered services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 552, Sec. 2.   (AB 954)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

362.04.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Caregiver” means any licensed certified foster parent, approved relative caregiver, or approved nonrelative extended family member, or approved resource family.

(2) “Reasonable and prudent parent” or “reasonable and prudent parent standard” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 362.05.

(3) “Short term” means no more than 24 consecutive hours.

(b) Every caregiver may arrange for occasional short-term babysitting of their foster child and allow individuals to supervise the
 foster child for the purposes set forth in Section 362.05, or on occasions, including, but not limited to, when the foster parent has a medical or other health care appointment, grocery or other shopping, personal grooming appointments, special occasions for the foster parents, foster parent training classes, school-related meetings (such as parent-teacher conferences), business meetings, adult social gatherings, or an occasional evening out by the foster parent.

(c) Caregivers shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard in determining and selecting appropriate babysitters for occasional short-term use.

(d) The caregiver shall endeavor to provide the babysitter with the following information before leaving the child for purposes of short-term care:

(1) Information about the child’s emotional, behavioral,
 medical, or physical conditions, if any, necessary to provide care for the child during the time the foster child is being supervised by the babysitter.

(2) Any medication that should be administered to the foster child during the time the foster child is being supervised by the babysitter.

(3) Emergency contact information that is valid during the time the foster child is being supervised by the babysitter.

(e) Babysitters selected by the caregiver to provide occasional short-term care to a foster child under the provisions of this section shall be exempt from any department regulation requiring health screening or cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification or training.

(f) Each state and local entity shall ensure that private agencies that provide
 foster care services to dependent children have policies consistent with this section. Policies that are not consistent with this section include those that are incompatible with, contradictory to, or more restrictive than this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 425, Sec. 6.   (SB 794)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

362.05.

(a) (1) Every child adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court shall be entitled to participate in age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities, including, but not limited to, access to computer technology and the Internet. A state or local regulation or policy shall not prevent, or create barriers to, participation in those activities. Each state and local entity shall ensure that private agencies that provide foster care services to dependent children have policies consistent with this section and that those agencies promote and protect the ability of dependent children to participate in age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities, including, but not limited to, access to
 computer technology and the Internet. A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or his or her responsible designee, and a caregiver, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04, shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard in determining whether to give permission for a child residing in foster care to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities, including, but not limited to, access to computer technology and the Internet. A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or his or her responsible designee, and a caregiver shall take reasonable steps to determine the appropriateness of the activity in consideration of the child’s age, maturity, and developmental level.

(2) Training for
 caregivers shall include knowledge and skills relating to the reasonable and prudent parent standard for the participation of the child in age or developmentally appropriate activities, consistent with this section and Section 671(a)(24) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or his or her responsible designee, is encouraged to consult with social work or treatment staff members who are most familiar with the child at the group home in applying and using the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(c) (1) “Reasonable and prudent parent” or “reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the standard characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that
 maintain the health, safety, and best interests of a child while at the same time encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child, that a caregiver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in foster care under the responsibility of the state to participate in age or developmentally appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.

(2) The term “age or developmentally appropriate” means both of the following:

(A) Activities or items that are generally accepted as suitable for children of the same chronological age or level of maturity or that are determined to be developmentally appropriate for a child, based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities that are typical for an age or age
 group.

(B) In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacities of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 997, Sec. 1.   (AB 2448)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

362.06.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Caregiver” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 362.04.

(2) “Child” means a person who is under 18 years of age and placed in the care and supervision of the caregiver by a placing agency pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement or by order of the court.

(3) “Nonminor dependent” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(4) “Placing agency” means a county child welfare department, a
 county probation department, or a foster family agency with responsibility for the placement of the child or nonminor dependent.

(5) “Reasonable and prudent parent standard” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 362.05.

(b) Except as provided in (c), a caregiver shall be immune from liability in a civil action to recover damages for injury, death, or loss to person or property caused by either of the following:

(1) An act or omission made by the caregiver while exercising a reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(2) An act or omission of a child or nonminor dependent while the child or nonminor dependent is placed in the home of the caregiver.

(c) The immunity described in subdivision (b) shall not apply to a caregiver if any of the following apply:

(1) The act of the caregiver exceeded a caregiver’s duty or authority, as defined by statute, regulation, licensing standards, or similar written instructions.

(2) The act or omission of the caregiver was made with malice or in bad faith, or was a result of recklessness or gross negligence on the part of the caregiver.

(3) The act or omission of the caregiver did not comply with instructions received from the county placing agency regarding specific care and supervision of the child.

(4) Liability for the act or omission of the caregiver is expressly imposed by any other law.

(d) The good faith of a caregiver and the compliance of the caregiver with any written instructions received from the county placing agency are presumed in a civil action. Any person who asserts that a caregiver did not act in good faith, or did not comply with written instructions received from the placing agency, has the burden of proving that assertion.

(e) This section does not prevent foster children, their parents, guardians, or guardians ad litem from bringing a claim for damages arising from, and peculiar to, the foster care relationship, pursuant to the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund established under Article 2.5 (commencing with Section
 1527) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 25.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

362.1.

(a) In order to maintain ties between the parent or guardian and any siblings and the child, and to provide information relevant to deciding if, and when, to return a child to the custody of his or her parent or guardian, or to encourage or suspend sibling interaction, any order placing a child in foster care, and ordering reunification services, shall provide as follows:

(1) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), for visitation between the parent or guardian and the child. Visitation shall be as frequent as possible, consistent with the well-being of the child.

(B) No visitation order shall jeopardize the safety of the child. To protect the
 safety of the child, the court may keep the child’s address confidential. If the parent of the child has been convicted of murder in the first degree, as defined in Section 189 of the Penal Code, and the victim of the murder was the other parent of the child, the court shall order visitation between the child and the parent only if that order would be consistent with Section 3030 of the Family Code.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16002, for visitation between the child and any siblings, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that sibling interaction is contrary to the safety or well-being of either child.

(3) Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16002, for review of the reasons for any suspension of sibling interaction at each periodic review hearing pursuant to Section 366, and for a requirement that, in order for a suspension to continue, the court
 shall make a renewed finding that sibling interaction is contrary to the safety or well-being of either child.

(4) If the child is a teen parent who has custody of his or her child and that child is not a dependent of the court pursuant to this chapter, for visitation among the teen parent, the child’s noncustodial parent, and appropriate family members, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that visitation would be detrimental to the teen parent.

(b) When reunification services are not ordered pursuant to Section 361.5, the child’s plan for legal permanency shall include consideration of the existence of and the relationship with any sibling pursuant to Section 16002, including their impact on placement and visitation.

(c) As used in this section, “sibling” means a person related to the identified
 child by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 425, Sec. 8.   (SB 794)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

362.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature that if a placement out-of-home is necessary pursuant to an individualized education program, that this placement be as near the child’s home as possible, unless it is not in the best interest of the child. When the court determines that it is the best interest of the child to be placed out-of-state, the court shall read into the record that in-state alternatives have been explored and that they cannot meet the needs of the child, and the court shall state on the record the reasons for the out-of-state placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1128, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

362.3.

In addition to the notice provided in Sections 297 and 332, the juvenile court may issue its citation directing any parent, guardian, or foster parent of the person concerning whom a petition has been filed to appear at the time and place set for any hearing under the provisions of this chapter, and directing any person having custody or control of the child concerning whom the petition has been filed to bring the child with him or her. The citation shall, in addition, state that a parent, guardian, or foster parent may be required to participate in a counseling or education program with the child concerning whom the petition has been filed. Personal service of the citation shall be made at least 24 hours before the time stated therein for the appearance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 416, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

362.4.

(a) If the juvenile court terminates its jurisdiction over a minor who has been adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court prior to the minor’s attainment of the age of 18 years, and proceedings for dissolution of marriage, for nullity of marriage, or for legal separation, of the minor’s parents, or proceedings to establish the paternity of the minor child brought under the Uniform Parentage Act, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12 of the Family Code, are pending in the superior court of any county, or an order has been entered with regard to the custody of that minor, the juvenile court on its own motion, may issue a protective order as provided for in Section 213.5 or as defined in Section
 6218 of the Family Code, and an order determining the custody of, or visitation with, the child.

(b) Any order issued pursuant to this section shall continue until modified or terminated by a subsequent order of the superior court. The order of the juvenile court shall be filed in the proceeding for nullity, dissolution, or legal separation, or in the proceeding to establish paternity, at the time the juvenile court terminates its jurisdiction over the minor, and shall become a part thereof.

(c) If no action is filed or pending relating to the custody of the minor in the superior court of any county, the juvenile court order may be used as the sole basis for opening a file in the superior court of the county in which the parent, who has been given custody, resides. The court may direct
 the parent or the clerk of the juvenile court to transmit the order to the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the order is to be filed. The clerk of
 the superior court shall, immediately upon receipt, open a file, without a filing fee, and assign a case number.

(d) The clerk of the superior court shall, upon the filing of any juvenile court custody order, send a copy of the order with the case number by first-class mail or by electronic means pursuant to Section 212.5 to the juvenile court and to the parents at the address listed on the order.

(e) The Judicial Council shall adopt forms for any custody or restraining order issued under this section. These form orders shall not be confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 130.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

362.5.

(a) The clerk of the superior court shall open a separate court file for nonminor dependents under the dependency, delinquency, or transition jurisdiction of the court.

(b) Access to the nonminor dependent court file shall be limited to all of the following:

(1) Court personnel.

(2) The district attorney, if the nonminor dependent is also a delinquent ward.

(3) The nonminor dependent.

(4) The attorney for the nonminor dependent.

(5) Judges, referees, and other hearing officers actively participating in juvenile proceedings involving the nonminor dependent.

(6) The social services agency or probation department.

(7) The State Department of Social Services, to carry out its duties pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 12 of the Family Code, to oversee and monitor county child welfare agencies, children in foster care or receiving foster care assistance; and out-of-state placements, Section 10850.4, and pursuant to Section 2.

(8) The county counsel.

(9) Authorized legal staff or special investigators who are peace officers who are employed by, or who are authorized representatives of, the State
 Department of Social Services, as necessary for the performance of their duties to inspect, license, and investigate community care facilities, to ensure that the standards of care and services provided in those facilities are adequate and appropriate, and to ascertain compliance with the rules and regulations to which the facilities are subject. The confidential information shall remain confidential except for purposes of inspection, licensing, or investigation pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) and Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding in relation thereto. The confidential information may be used by the State Department of Social Services in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding. The confidential information shall be available only to the judge or hearing officer and to the parties to the case. Names that are confidential shall be listed in attachments separate from the
 general pleadings. The confidential information shall be sealed after the conclusion of the criminal, civil, or administrative hearings, and may not subsequently be released, except in accordance with this subdivision. If the confidential information does not result in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, it shall be sealed after the State Department of Social Services decides that no further action will be taken in the matter of suspected licensing violations. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, confidential information in the possession of the State Department of Social Services may not contain the name of the nonminor dependent.

(c) The nonminor dependent’s parent and the parent’s attorney may only access the file if the parent is still receiving reunification services.

(d) All other individuals requesting access to the court file must be designated by
 court order of the judge of the juvenile court upon filing a petition, which shall be determined pursuant to Section 827.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 17.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

362.6.

(a) When a hearing is requested pursuant to Section 1202.05 of the Penal Code, the sentencing court shall forward a copy of the request to the child protective services agency (CPS), or the appropriate entity, in the county in which any related dependency matters as to the affected child victim have been heard or to the county in which the child victim resides. CPS, or the appropriate entity, shall initiate a hearing to determine whether visitation between the child victim and the incarcerated person would be in the best interests of the child victim. If the court determines that visitation with the incarcerated person is in the best interests of the child victim, CPS, or the appropriate entity, shall notify the Department of Corrections to provide for contact or visitation, or both, as ordered by the court.

(b) The court, if visitation is allowed, may impose whatever safeguards or restrictions it deems appropriate to protect the child victim.

(c) The court’s order shall be transmitted to all parties and to the Department of Corrections.

(d) Any party may return to the juvenile court at any time prior to the child victim’s 18th birthday and request modification of the court’s order based on a change of circumstances. For these purposes, the juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction over the matter until the child victim reaches the age of 18 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1008, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

362.7.

When the home of a nonrelative extended family member is being considered for placement of a child, the home shall be evaluated, and approval of that home shall be granted or denied, pursuant to the same standards set forth in the regulations for the licensing of foster family homes that prescribe standards of safety and sanitation for the physical plant and standards for basic personal care, supervision, and services provided by the caregiver.

A “nonrelative extended family member” is defined as an adult caregiver who has an established familial relationship with a relative of the child, as
 defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 361.3, or a familial or mentoring relationship with the child. The county welfare department shall verify the existence of a relationship through interviews with the parent and child or with one or more third parties. The parties may include relatives of the child, teachers, medical professionals, clergy, neighbors, and family friends.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 545)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

362.8.

(a) At a review hearing where a parent or guardian’s participation in reunification or family maintenance services is considered by the court, including, but not limited to, hearings pursuant to Sections 364, 366.21, 366.22, 366.25, and 388, the parent or guardian shall not be considered to be noncompliant with the court-ordered case plan when the court finds that the parent or guardian is unable to pay for a service or that payment for a service would create an undue financial hardship for the parent or guardian, and the social worker did not provide a comparable free service that was accessible and available to the parent or guardian to comply with the case plan during the period subject to the court’s review.

(b) For purposes of this section, a parent or guardian who qualifies for the services of court-appointed counsel pursuant to Section 317 is presumed to be unable to pay the cost of court-ordered
 services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 552, Sec. 3.   (AB 954)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

363.

If the parent or person legally responsible for the care of any minor who is found to be a person described in Section 300 receives public assistance or care, any portion of which is attributable to the minor, a copy of the order of the court providing for the removal of the minor from his or her home shall be furnished to the appropriate social services official, who shall reduce the public assistance and care furnished the parent or other person by the amount attributable to the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 701, Sec. 4.   Effective August 29, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

364.

(a) Every hearing in which an order is made placing a child under the supervision of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 and in which the child is not removed from the physical custody of his or her parent or guardian shall be continued to a specific future date not to exceed six months after the date of the original dispositional hearing. The continued hearing shall be placed on the appearance calendar. The court shall advise all persons present of the date of the future hearings, of their rights to be present, and to be represented by counsel.

(b) At least 10 calendar days prior to the hearing, the social worker shall file a supplemental report with the court describing the services offered to the family and the progress made by the family in eliminating the conditions or factors requiring court supervision. The social worker shall also make a recommendation regarding the necessity of continued supervision. A copy of this report shall be furnished to all parties at least 10 calendar days prior to the hearing.

(c) After hearing any evidence presented by the social worker, the parent, the guardian, or the child, the court shall determine whether continued supervision is necessary. The court shall terminate its jurisdiction unless the social worker or his or her department establishes by a preponderance of evidence that the conditions still exist which would justify initial assumption of jurisdiction under Section 300, or that those conditions are likely to exist if supervision is withdrawn. Failure of the parent or guardian to participate regularly in any court ordered treatment program shall constitute prima facie evidence that the conditions which justified initial assumption of jurisdiction still exist and that continued supervision is necessary.

(d) If the court retains jurisdiction it shall continue the matter to a specified date, not more than six months from the time of the hearing, at which point the court shall again follow the procedure specified in subdivision (c).

(e) In any case in which the court has ordered that a parent or guardian shall retain physical custody of a child subject to supervision by a social worker, and the social worker subsequently receives a report of acts or circumstances which indicate that there is reasonable cause to believe that the child is a person described in subdivision (a), (d), or (e) of Section 300, the social worker shall commence proceedings under this chapter. If, as a result of the proceedings required, the court finds that the child is a person described in subdivision (a), (d), or (e) of Section 300, the court shall remove the child from the care, custody, and control of the child’s parent or guardian and shall commit the child to the care, custody, and control of the social worker pursuant to Section 361.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

364.05.

Notwithstanding Section 364, in a county of the first class, a copy of the report required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 364 shall be provided to all parties at least 10 calendar days before the hearing. This may be accomplished by electronically serving the report pursuant to Section 212.5 or by mailing the report at least 15 calendar days before the hearing to a party whose address is within the State of California, or at least 20 calendar days before the hearing to a party whose address is outside the State of California. The court shall grant a reasonable continuance, not to exceed 10 calendar days, upon request by any party or his or her counsel on the ground that the report was not provided at least 10 calendar
 days before the hearing as required by this section, unless the party or his or her counsel has expressly waived the requirement that the report be provided within the 10-day period or the court finds that the party’s ability to proceed at the hearing is not prejudiced by the lack of timely service of the report. In making this determination, the court shall presume that a party is prejudiced by the lack of timely service of the report, and may find that the party is not prejudiced only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 131.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

365.

The court may require the social worker or any other agency to render any periodic reports concerning children committed to its care, custody, and control under the provisions of Section 362 that the court deems necessary or desirable. The court may require that the social worker, or any other public agency organized to provide care for needy or neglected children, shall perform the visitation and make periodic reports to the courts concerning children committed under those provisions that the court deems necessary or desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

366.

(a) (1) The status of every dependent child in foster care shall be reviewed periodically as determined by the court but no less frequently than once every six months, as calculated from the date of the original dispositional hearing, until the hearing described in Section 366.26 is completed. The court shall consider the safety of the child and shall determine all of the following:

(A) The continuing necessity for and appropriateness of the placement. If the child or nonminor dependent is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program on or after October 1, 2021, or placed in a community treatment facility on or after July 1, 2022, the court shall consider the
 evidence and documentation submitted pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 366.1 in making this determination.

(B) For a child or nonminor dependent who is not residing with their relatives, nonrelative extended family members, or in the case of an Indian child, their extended family members as defined in Section 224.1, or an Indian custodian, whether the social worker has continued efforts, and in the case of an Indian child, the active efforts, as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 224.1, to locate any
 relatives, extended family members, or nonrelative extended family members who could provide family support or possible placement of the child or nonminor dependent and the names of those relatives, extended family members, or nonrelative extended family members and the results of those efforts.

(C) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts, or, in the case of a child 16 years of age or older with another planned permanent living arrangement, the ongoing and intensive efforts, to return the child to a safe home and to complete any steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child,
 including efforts to maintain relationships between a child who is 10 years of age or older and who has been in an out-of-home placement for six months or longer, and individuals other than the child’s siblings who are important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interests. Where it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, the court shall also determine whether the agency has made active efforts, as defined in Section 224.1 and as described in Section 361.7, to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family.

(D) Whether there should be any limitation on the right of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to make educational decisions or developmental services decisions for the child. That limitation shall
 be specifically addressed in the court order and shall not exceed those necessary to protect the child. Whenever the court specifically limits the right of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to make educational decisions or developmental services decisions for the child, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational decisions or developmental services decisions for the child pursuant to Section 361.

(E) (i) Whether the child has other siblings under the court’s jurisdiction, and, if any siblings exist, all of the following:

(I) The nature of the relationship between the child and the child’s siblings.

(II) The appropriateness of developing or maintaining the sibling relationships
 pursuant to Section 16002.

(III) If the siblings are not placed together in the same home, why the siblings are not placed together and what efforts are being made to place the siblings together, or why those efforts are not appropriate.

(IV) If the siblings are not placed together, all of the following:

(ia) The frequency and nature of the visits between the siblings.

(ib) If there are visits between the siblings, whether the visits are supervised or unsupervised. If the visits are supervised, a discussion of the reasons why the visits are supervised, and what needs to be accomplished in order for the visits to be unsupervised.

(ic) If there are visits between the siblings, a description of the location and length of the visits.

(id) Any plan to increase visitation between the siblings.

(V) The impact of the sibling relationships on the child’s placement and planning for legal permanence.

(VI) The continuing need to suspend sibling interaction, if applicable, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16002.

(ii) The factors the court may consider in making a determination regarding the nature of the child’s sibling relationships may include, but are not limited to, whether the siblings were raised together in the same home, whether the siblings have shared significant common
 experiences or have existing close and strong bonds, whether either sibling expresses a desire to visit or live with their sibling, as applicable, and whether ongoing contact is in the child’s best emotional interests.

(F) The extent of progress that has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.

(G) (i) For a child who is 10 years of age or older, is in junior high, middle, or high school, and has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, or a nonminor dependent, whether the social worker or probation officer has verified that the child or nonminor dependent has received comprehensive sexual health education that meets the requirements of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of
 Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code through the school system or has ensured that the child will receive the instruction.

(ii) For a child or nonminor dependent described in clause (i), whether the social worker or probation officer has done all of the following:

(I) Informed the child or nonminor dependent that they may access age-appropriate, medically accurate information about reproductive and sexual health care, including, but not limited to, unplanned pregnancy prevention, abstinence, use of birth control, abortion, and the prevention and treatment of sexually transmitted infections.

(II) Informed the child or nonminor dependent, in an age and developmentally appropriate manner, of the
 child’s right to consent to sexual and reproductive health services and the child’s confidentiality rights regarding those services.

(III) Informed the child or nonminor dependent how to access reproductive and sexual health care services and facilitated access to that care, including by assisting with any identified barriers to care, as needed.

(iii) This subparagraph does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.

(iv) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.

(H) (i) For a child who is 16 years of age or older or for
 a nonminor dependent, whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(ii) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.
